Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Department of
Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Progressing Rural Economic Prosperity Fund of the State Treasury
created in Section 256 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the sum
of Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) for the purpose
of providing resources to an economic development organization with
an office located in a town with a population of thirty-five
thousand (35,000) people or less per the latest Federal Decennial
Census, and located in the central part of the state, to construct
and operate a transitional living facility to serve those aging out
of foster care or those who are low income.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:

There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Department of
Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Progressing Rural Economic Prosperity Fund of the State Treasury
created in Section 256 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the sum
of Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) for the purpose of
constructing needed facility upgrades, such as fairground arena
connectors, electrical infrastructure, and facilities associated
with livestock events at a location where statewide events commonly
referred to as a "state fair" occurs in the central region of the
state.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Department of
Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Progressing Rural Economic Prosperity Fund of the State Treasury
created in Section 256 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the sum
of One Million Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($1,750,000.00)
for the purpose of creating energy efficiencies at a university
campus located in Western Oklahoma with a student population of less
than one thousand one hundred (1,100) students.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4047 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4047 Page 3